Nebraska, session 109, LB679.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB679 LB679
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-1802, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1802 (1) The county treasurer shall, not less than four nor more
than six weeks prior to the first Monday of March in each year, make out
a list of all real property subject to sale and the amount of all
delinquent taxes against each item with an accompanying notice stating
that so much of such property described in the list as may be necessary
for that purpose will, on the first Monday of March next thereafter, be
sold by negotiated bulk sale or by such county treasurer at public
auction at his or her office for the taxes, interest, and costs thereon.
In making such list, the county treasurer shall describe the property as
it is described on the tax list and shall include the name of the owner
of record of the property, the property's parcel number, if any, and the
property's street address, if any.
(2) For purposes of this section and sections 77-1807 and 77-1818, a
negotiated bulk sale is the sale or transfer of multiple parcels of real
property for delinquent taxes to one or more persons by any county board.
At the sole discretion of the county board, any such sale or transfer may
include any terms deemed appropriate or necessary unless any such term
would violate state law. The sale price may include a reasonable
administrative fee as determined by the county board which amount shall
be included in the sum noted on each tax certificate issued pursuant to
77-1818.
Sec. 2. Section 77-1807, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1807 (1)(a) This subsection applies until January 1, 2015.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c) of this
subsection, the person who offers to pay the amount of taxes due on any
real property for the smallest portion of the same shall be the
purchaser, and when such person designates the smallest portion of the
real property for which he or she will pay the amount of taxes assessed
-2-

LB679 LB679
2025 2025
against any such property, the portion thus designated shall be
considered an undivided portion.
(c) If a land bank gives an automatically accepted bid for the real
property pursuant to section 18-3417, the land bank shall be the
purchaser, regardless of the bid of any other person.
(d) If no person bids for a less quantity than the whole and no land
bank has given an automatically accepted bid pursuant to section 18-3417,
the treasurer may sell any real property to any one who will take the
whole and pay the taxes and charges thereon.
(e) If the homestead is listed separately as a homestead, it shall
be sold only for the taxes delinquent thereon.
(2)(a) This subsection applies beginning January 1, 2015.
(b) If a land bank gives an automatically accepted bid for real
property pursuant to section 18-3417, the land bank shall be the
purchaser and no public or private auction shall be held under sections
77-1801 to 77-1863.
(c) If no land bank has given an automatically accepted bid pursuant
to section 18-3417, the person who offers to pay the amount of taxes,
delinquent interest, and costs due on any real property shall be the
purchaser.
(d) The county treasurer shall announce bidding rules at the
beginning of the public auction, and such rules shall apply to all
bidders throughout the public auction.
(e) The sale, if conducted in a round-robin format, shall be
conducted in the following manner:
(i) At the commencement of the sale, a count shall be taken of the
number of registered bidders present who want to be eligible to purchase
property. Each registered bidder shall only be counted once. If
additional registered bidders appear at the sale after the commencement
of a round, such registered bidders shall have the opportunity to
participate at the end of the next following round, if any, as provided
-3-

LB679 LB679
2025 2025
in subdivision (v) of this subdivision;
(ii) Sequentially enumerated tickets shall be placed in a
receptacle. The number of tickets in the receptacle for the first round
shall equal the count taken in subdivision (i) of this subdivision, and
the number of tickets in the receptacle for each subsequent round shall
equal the number of the count taken in subdivision (i) of this
subdivision plus additional registered bidders as provided in subdivision
(v) of this subdivision;
(iii) In a manner determined by the county treasurer, tickets shall
be selected from the receptacle by hand for each registered bidder
whereby each ticket has an equal chance of being selected. Tickets shall
be selected until there are no tickets remaining in the receptacle;
(iv) The number on the ticket selected for a registered bidder shall
represent the order in which a registered bidder may purchase property
consisting of one parcel subject to sale from the list per round; and
(v) If property listed remains unsold at the end of a round, a new
round shall commence until all property listed is either sold or, if any
property listed remains unsold, each registered bidder has consecutively
passed on the opportunity to make a purchase. Registered bidders who are
not present when it is their turn to purchase property shall be
considered to have passed on the opportunity to make a purchase. At the
beginning of the second and any subsequent rounds, the county treasurer
shall inquire whether there are additional registered bidders. If
additional registered bidders are present, tickets for each such bidder
shall be placed in a receptacle and selected as provided in subdivisions
(ii) through (iv) of this subdivision. The second and any subsequent
rounds shall proceed in the same manner and purchase order as the last
preceding round, except that any additional registered bidders shall be
given the opportunity to purchase at the end of the round in the order
designated on their ticket.
(f) Any property remaining unsold upon completion of the public
-4-

LB679 LB679
2025 2025
auction shall be sold at a private sale pursuant to section 77-1814.
(g) A bidder shall (i) register with the county treasurer prior to
participating in the sale, (ii) provide proof that it maintains a
registered agent for service of process with the Secretary of State if
the bidder is a foreign corporation, and (iii) pay a twenty-five-dollar
registration fee. The fee is not refundable upon redemption.
(h) If any property listed has been sold by negotiated bulk sale
pursuant to section 77-1802 prior to the commencement of the public
auction, such property shall be removed from the list of real property
subject to sale prior to the beginning of the public auction.
Sec. 3. Section 77-1818, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1818 (1) The purchaser of any real property sold by negotiated
bulk sale or by the county treasurer for taxes shall be entitled to a
certificate in writing, describing the real property so purchased, the
sum paid, and the time when the purchaser will be entitled to a deed,
which certificate shall be signed by the county treasurer in his or her
official capacity and shall be presumptive evidence of the regularity of
all prior proceedings. Each tax lien shall be shown on a single
certificate. The purchaser acquires a perpetual lien of the tax on the
real property, and if after the taxes become delinquent he or she
subsequently pays any taxes levied on the property, whether levied for
any year or years previous or subsequent to such sale, he or she shall
have the same lien for them and may add them to the amount paid by him or
her in the purchase.
(2) Upon issuance of the certificate, the purchaser shall attempt to
notify, by personal service, the property owner of the real property that
was sold for taxes at the address listed for such owner in the records of
the county assessor. The notice shall (a) state that a certificate has
been issued, (b) include a brief description of the property owner's
legal rights to redeem the real property, (c) identify the real property
-5-

LB679 LB679
2025 2025
by the street address listed in the records of the county assessor, (d)
include the total amount of taxes, interest, and costs for which the
property was sold and a recitation that interest and fees may accrue, and
(e) include a prominent warning that failure to act may result in
forfeiture of the property after three years. The purchaser shall file
proof of prove such service of notice by affidavit, and such affidavit
shall be filed with the application for the tax deed pursuant to section
77-1837. An administrative fee shall be allowed for any attempted or
actual service of notice under this subsection. The administrative fee
shall be equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the actual cost
incurred by the purchaser for such service of notice. The amount of such
fee shall be noted by the county treasurer in the record opposite the
real property described in the notice and shall be collected by the
county treasurer in case of redemption for the benefit of the holder of
the certificate. The purchaser shall notify the county treasurer of the
amount of such fee within thirty days after completion of the service of
notice in a manner prescribed by the county treasurer.
Sec. 4. Section 77-1837, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1837 (1) At any time within nine months after the expiration of
three years after the date of sale of any real estate for taxes or
special assessments, if such real estate has not been redeemed and the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section have been met, the
purchaser or his or her assignee may apply to the county treasurer for a
tax deed for the real estate described in such purchaser's or assignee's
tax sale certificate. The county treasurer shall execute and deliver a
deed of conveyance for the real estate described in such tax sale
certificate if he or she has received the following:
(a) The tax sale certificate;
(b) The issuance fee for the tax deed and the fee of the notary
public or other officer acknowledging the tax deed, as required under
-6-

LB679 LB679
2025 2025
section 77-1823;
(c) Proof of The affidavit proving personal service of the notice
required in subsection (2) of section 77-1818;
(d) For any notice provided pursuant to section 77-1832, the
affidavit proving service of notice, the copy of the notice, and the copy
of the title search required under section 77-1833; and
(e) For any notice provided by publication pursuant to section
77-1834, the affidavit of the publisher, manager, or other employee of
the newspaper, the copy of the notice, the affidavit of the purchaser or
assignee, and the copy of the title search required under section
77-1835.
(2) The purchaser or his or her assignee may apply for a tax deed
under this section if one hundred ten percent of the assessed value of
the real estate described in the tax sale certificate, less the amount
that would be needed to redeem such real estate, is twenty-five thousand
dollars or less. If such requirement is not met, the purchaser or his or
her assignee shall foreclose the lien represented by the tax sale
certificate pursuant to section 77-1902.
(3) The failure of the county treasurer to issue the deed of
conveyance if requested within the timeframe provided in subsection (1)
of this section shall not impair the validity of such deed if there has
otherwise been compliance with sections 77-1801 to 77-1863.
Sec. 5. Section 77-1909, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1909 In its decree, the court shall ascertain and determine the
amount of taxes, special assessments, and other liens, interest, and
costs chargeable to each particular item of real property, excluding any
lien on real estate for special assessments levied by any sanitary and
improvement district which special assessments have not been previously
offered for sale by the county treasurer. The court shall , and award to
the plaintiff a reasonable an attorney's fee, unless waived by the
-7-

LB679 LB679
2025 2025
plaintiff, of two thousand five hundred dollars. The plaintiff may apply
to the court for any attorney's fees in excess of two thousand five
hundred dollars and the court shall award any amount it determines to be
reasonable under the circumstances. Any attorney's fees awarded in an
amount equal to ten percent of the amount due which shall be taxed as
part of the costs in the action and apportioned equitably as other costs.
The amount of the reasonable attorney's fee awarded to the plaintiff
pursuant to this section shall be increased on January 1, 2027, and on
January 1 of successive years, by the percentage change, if any, as of
August of the previous year over the level as of August of the year
preceding that year in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers,
Midwest Region, or its successor index, as published by the Bureau of
Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor, or its
successor agency.
Sec. 6. Original section 77-1909, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 77-1802, 77-1807, 77-1818, and 77-1837, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-8-